Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2231.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [462.3573] MIXED HOUSING AND COMMERCIAL CORRIDOR DISTRICTS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For the purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Accessory dwelling unit" means an addition or alteration that is an additional, subordinate dwelling unit on the same lot, and is entirely within a dwelling unit, attached to a dwelling unit, or in a detached structure. new text end new text begin (c) "Applicant" has the meaning provided in section 15.99. new text end new text begin (d) "Commercial corridor district" means a zoning district that is required to comply with subdivision 2, paragraph (c). new text end new text begin (e) "Covered municipality" means a city of the first class, an urban municipality, or a nonurban municipality. new text end new text begin (f) "Duplex" means a single building sited on a single lot that contains two separate residential units with separation either horizontal or vertical. new text end new text begin (g) "Fourplex" means a single building sited on a single lot that contains four residential units. new text end new text begin (h) "Minimum parking mandate" means a law, rule, or ordinance that specifies a minimum number of motor vehicle parking spaces, including on-street or off-street within a garage or other enclosed area. new text end new text begin (i) "Mixed housing" means all of the following types of dwellings: new text end new text begin (1) a single-family dwelling; new text end new text begin (2) a townhouse; new text end new text begin (3) a duplex; new text end new text begin (4) a triplex; new text end new text begin (5) a fourplex; and new text end new text begin (6) an accessory dwelling unit on a lot with a single-family dwelling. new text end new text begin (j) "Mixed housing district" means a zoning district that is required to comply with subdivision 2, paragraph (a) or (b). new text end new text begin (k) "Municipal state-aid street" means a street within a municipality that has been established as a municipal state-aid street pursuant to section 162.09. new text end new text begin (l) "Nonurban municipality" means a municipality with a population greater than 10,000 that is not an urban municipality or a city of the first class. new text end new text begin (m) "Request" has the meaning provided in section 15.99, except that for the purposes of this section, it also includes a written application for a building permit or a proposed subdivision related to the housing authorized under subdivision 2. new text end new text begin (n) "Residential unit" means a building or part of a building used or intended to be used for dwelling purposes by a single owner or tenant. new text end new text begin (o) "Single-family dwelling" means a building that contains one residential unit. new text end new text begin (p) "Townhouse" means a single-family dwelling constructed in a group of two or more attached units in which each unit extends from the foundation to the roof and having open space on at least two sides of each unit. Each single-family dwelling shall be considered to be a separate building. Separate building service utilities shall be provided to each single-family dwelling unit when required by other chapters of the State Building Code. new text end new text begin (q) "Triplex" means a single building sited on a single lot that contains three residential units. new text end new text begin (r) "Urban municipality" means a municipality other than a city of the first class that is adjacent to, or has a border that is within one mile of the border of, a city with a population greater than 150,000. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Mixed housing and commercial corridor districts required. new text end new text begin (a) An urban municipality or a city of the first class must create mixed housing districts that allow the following types of residential development in at least 75 percent of the area within the municipality that is zoned to permit residential use: new text end new text begin (1) any type of mixed housing as a permitted use on every lot in the mixed housing district, except an urban municipality may prohibit fourplexes; or new text end new text begin (2) any combination of residential developments or mixed housing sufficient to permit an average density in the mixed housing district of at least one residential unit per every 1,500 square feet. new text end new text begin (b) A nonurban municipality must enact mixed housing districts that allow the following types of residential development on at least 50 percent of the area within the nonurban municipality that is zoned to permit residential use: new text end new text begin (1) any type of mixed housing as a permitted use on every lot in the mixed housing district, except a nonurban municipality may prohibit fourplexes; or new text end new text begin (2) any combination of residential developments or mixed housing sufficient to permit an average density in the mixed housing district of at least one residential unit per every 4,000 square feet. new text end new text begin (c) A covered municipality must create commercial corridor districts that encompass every lot in the municipality that has frontage on a municipal state-aid street. The commercial corridor districts must permit the following residential density: new text end new text begin (1) cities of the first class must permit an average density of at least ... residential units per acre in the commercial corridor district; new text end new text begin (2) urban municipalities must permit an average density of at least ... residential units per acre in the commercial corridor district; or new text end new text begin (3) nonurban municipalities must permit an average density of at least ... residential units per acre in the commercial corridor district. new text end new text begin (d) When determining where to site commercial corridor and mixed housing districts, a covered municipality must consider proximity to transit, public amenities, and commercial areas. new text end new text begin (e) Subject to the limitations in subdivisions 3, 4, and 5, a covered municipality may require a development permitted under paragraphs (a), (b), and (c) to comply with any standards, performance conditions, or requirements, including the adequacy of existing public infrastructure, imposed by a municipality to promote public health, safety, and general welfare. new text end new text begin (f) Nothing in this section authorizes a covered municipality to permit a development that is prohibited by state or federal law or rule, or is prohibited under an ordinance adopted pursuant to such a state or federal law or rule, that protects floodplains, areas of critical or historic concern, wild and scenic rivers, or shore land, or that otherwise restrict residential units to protect and preserve the public health, the environment, or scenic areas. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Municipal standards; limitations. new text end new text begin (a) The following limitations on municipal authority apply to the developments permitted in mixed housing and commercial corridor districts required under subdivision 2. new text end new text begin (b) Subject to the maximum residential units permitted on a lot, districts required under subdivision 2 must authorize mixed housing as a permitted use. new text end new text begin (c) A covered municipality must not impose requirements related to the bulk and size of buildings that prevent the type of housing or number of residential units authorized by paragraph (b) from being constructed with at least 1,500 square feet of habitable floor space per residential unit, including requirements related to lot coverage, setbacks, maximum height, minimum unit size, dimensions, minimum square footage on a structure foundation, or floor area ratio. new text end new text begin (d) Except as provided in the State Building Code for dwellings adhering to the Minnesota Residential Code, Minnesota Rules, chapter 1309, a covered municipality must not impose requirements related to construction materials or methods, including architectural elements, building egress, durability, energy efficiency, or light access requirements. new text end new text begin (e) A covered municipality must not impose minimum parking mandates, except that a municipality may pass and enforce an ordinance under section 169.346, subdivision 4, related to disability parking spaces or any provision of the Minnesota Accessibility Code, Minnesota Rules, chapter 1341. new text end new text begin (f) A covered municipality must not take any action that requires a residential property to be part of a homeowners association or provide an incentive for such membership. A municipality must not require or incentivize a homeowners association to adopt, revoke, or amend a term in any governing document or a rule or regulation not required under state law. A municipality must not condition approval of a residential building permit or conditional use permit, residential subdivision development or residential planned unit development, or any other permit related to residential development on the: new text end new text begin (1) creation of a homeowners association; new text end new text begin (2) inclusion of any service, feature, or common property necessitating a homeowners association; new text end new text begin (3) inclusion of any terms in a homeowners association declaration, bylaws, articles of incorporation, or any other governing document that is not required under state law; or new text end new text begin (4) adoption or revocation of, or amendment to, a rule or regulation governing the homeowners association or its members. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Administrative approvals. new text end new text begin (a) A covered municipality must establish and follow an administrative process to review requests related to developments in commercial corridor districts, including proposed residential lot splits and subdivisions, in accordance with the process outlined in section 15.99. new text end new text begin (b) In mixed housing districts, a covered municipality must apply the same administrative approval process to requests related to any type of mixed housing that it would apply to a single-family dwelling being developed on the same lot. A covered municipality may require a site development plan or similar materials for mixed housing, provided the timeline for the administrative approval process is the same or similar to that for a single-family dwelling. new text end new text begin (c) A municipality engaging in the process established in paragraph (a) or (b) must approve or deny a request for a building permit or proposed subdivision based on the request's alignment with the municipality's comprehensive plan, applicable zoning requirements, and subdivision regulations. new text end new text begin (d) A municipality engaging in the process established in paragraph (a) must: new text end new text begin (1) not require a conditional use permit or planned unit development agreement, except that a municipality may require a conditional use permit or planned unit development agreement to address an identified and documented risk to health or safety; new text end new text begin (2) not require more than one community meeting prior to approval of a request, except if more are required by state or federal law or the project involves or affects a lot located in a historic district under section 138.73; and new text end new text begin (3) provide any development agreement to the applicant no less than three days in advance of final plat approval, or before final approval of a request if a plat is not required. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Official controls; limitations. new text end new text begin A covered municipality may not use official controls to prohibit the application of this section, including by imposing performance conditions, standards, requirements, ordinances, fees, exactions, and dedications on any residential unit or development that are more restrictive than those in this section or other municipal law or rule. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Failure to comply; remedies. new text end new text begin (a) If a covered municipality fails to adopt new standards that meet the requirements of this section by the dates set out in paragraph (b), then any type of mixed housing shall be a permitted use on any lot within the municipality that is zoned to allow a residential use. new text end new text begin (b) A covered municipality must comply with the requirements of this section by the dates below: new text end new text begin (1) for a city of the first class, by June 30, 2026; new text end new text begin (2) for an urban municipality, by December 31, 2026; and new text end new text begin (3) for a nonurban municipality, by June 30, 2027. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Interim ordinance. new text end new text begin No covered municipality shall enact an interim ordinance as provided under section 462.355, subdivision 4, to prohibit or delay the application of this section. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2026. new text end